Utah statutes.
53A-17a-109.   Necessarily existent small schools -- Computing additional
weighted pupil units -- Consolidation of small schools.
(1)  Upon application by each school district, the State Board of Education
shall, in consultation with local school boards, classify particular schools
in each district as necessarily existent small schools.
(a)  Applications must be submitted to the state board before April 2, and the
board must report a decision to each school district before June 2.
(b)  The state board shall adopt standards and make rules to:
(i)  govern the approval of these schools consistent with principles of
efficiency and economy and which shall serve the purpose of eliminating
schools where consolidation is feasible by participation in special school
units; and
(ii)  ensure that districts are not building secondary schools in close
proximity to one another where economy and efficiency would be better served
by one school meeting the needs of secondary students in a designated
geographical area.
(c)  A one or two-year secondary school that has received necessarily existent
small school money under this section prior to July 1, 2000, may continue to
receive such money in subsequent years under state board rule.
(2)  The state board shall prepare and publish objective standards and
guidelines for determining which small schools are necessarily existent after
consultation with local school boards.
(3)  The additional units for schools classified as necessarily existent small
schools are computed using regression formulas adopted by the state board.
(a)  The regression formulas establish the following maximum sizes for funding
under the necessarily existent small school program:
(i)  Elementary                                         160
(ii)  One or two-year secondary                         300
(iii)  Three-year secondary                                     450
(iv)  Four-year secondary school                                500
(v)  Six-year secondary school                          600
(b)  Schools with fewer than 10 students shall receive the same add-on
weighted pupil units as schools with 10 students.
(c)  The state board shall prepare and distribute an allocation table based on
the regression formula to each school district.
(4) (a)  To avoid penalizing a district financially for consolidating its
small schools, additional units may be allowed a district each year, not to
exceed two years.
(b)  The units may not exceed the difference between what the district
receives for a consolidated school and what it would have received for the
small schools had they not been consolidated.
(c)  A district may use the monies allocated under this subsection for
maintenance and operation of school programs or for other school purposes as
approved by the state board.
